Georgia statutes. TITLE 41 Nuisances
CHAPTER 2 Abatement of Nuisances Generally
41-2-9.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] County or municipal ordinances relating to unfit buildings or structures.

In addition to any other remedies or enforcement mechanisms available, upon the adoption of an ordinance finding that dwelling, building, or structure conditions of the character described in Code Section 41-2-7 exist within a county or municipality, the governing body of such county or municipality is authorized to adopt ordinances relating to the dwellings, buildings, or structures within such county or municipality which are unfit for human habitation or commercial, industrial, or business uses and not in compliance with applicable codes, which are vacant and being used in connection with the commission of drug crimes, or which constitute an endangerment to the public health or safety as a result of unsanitary or unsafe conditions. Such ordinances shall include at least the following provisions:

That it is the duty of the owner of every dwelling, building, structure, or property within the jurisdiction to construct and maintain such dwelling, building, structure, or property in conformance with applicable codes in force within the jurisdiction, or such ordinances which regulate and prohibit activities on property and which declare it to be a public nuisance to construct or maintain any dwelling, building, structure, or property in violation of such codes or ordinances;

That a public officer be designated or appointed to exercise the powers prescribed by the ordinances;

That whenever a request is filed with the public officer by a public authority or by at least five residents of the municipality or by five residents of the unincorporated area of the county if the property in question is located in the unincorporated area of the county charging that any dwelling, building, structure, or property is unfit for human habitation or for commercial, industrial, or business use and not in compliance with applicable codes; is vacant and being used in connection with the commission of drug crimes; or constitutes an endangerment to the public health or safety as a result of unsanitary or unsafe conditions, the public officer shall make an investigation or inspection of the specific dwelling, building, structure, or property. If the officer’s investigation or inspection identifies that any dwelling, building, structure, or property is unfit for human habitation or for commercial, industrial, or business use and not in compliance with applicable codes; is vacant and being used in connection with the commission of drug crimes; or constitutes an endangerment to the public health or safety as a result of unsanitary or unsafe conditions, the public officer may issue a complaint in rem against the lot, tract, or parcel of real property on which such dwelling, building, or structure is situated or where such public health hazard or general nuisance exists and shall cause summons and a copy of the complaint to be served on the interested parties for such dwelling, building, or structure. The complaint shall identify the subject real property by appropriate street address and official tax map reference; identify the interested parties; state with particularity the factual basis for the action; and contain a statement of the action sought by the public officer to abate the alleged nuisance. The summons shall notify the interested parties that a hearing will be held before a court of competent jurisdiction as determined by Code Section 41-2-5, at a date and time certain and at a place within the county or municipality where the property is located. Such hearing shall be held not less than 15 days nor more than 45 days after the filing of said complaint in the proper court. The interested parties shall have the right to file an answer to the complaint and to appear in person or by attorney and offer testimony at the time and place fixed for hearing;

That if, after such notice and hearing, the court determines that the dwelling, building, or structure in question is unfit for human habitation or is unfit for its current commercial, industrial, or business use and not in compliance with applicable codes; is vacant and being used in connection with the commission of drug crimes; or constitutes an endangerment to the public health or safety as a result of unsanitary or unsafe conditions, the court shall state in writing findings of fact in support of such determination and shall issue and cause to be served upon the interested parties that have answered the complaint or appeared at the hearing an order:

If the repair, alteration, or improvement of the said dwelling, building, or structure can be made at a reasonable cost in relation to the present value of the dwelling, building, or structure, requiring the owner, within the time specified in the order, to repair, alter, or improve such dwelling, building, or structure so as to bring it into full compliance with the applicable codes relevant to the cited violation and, if applicable, to secure the structure so that it cannot be used in connection with the commission of drug crimes; or

If the repair, alteration, or improvement of the said dwelling, building, or structure in order to bring it into full compliance with applicable codes relevant to the cited violations cannot be made at a reasonable cost in relation to the present value of the dwelling, building, or structure, requiring the owner, within the time specified in the order, to demolish and remove such dwelling, building, or structure and all debris from the property.

For purposes of this Code section, the court shall make its determination of “reasonable cost in relation to the present value of the dwelling, building, or structure” without consideration of the value of the land on which the structure is situated; provided, however, that costs of the preparation necessary to repair, alter, or improve a structure may be considered. Income and financial status of the owner shall not be factor in the court’s determination. The present value of the structure and the costs of repair, alteration, or improvement may be established by affidavits of real estate appraisers with a Georgia appraiser classification as provided in Chapter 39A of Title 43, qualified building contractors, or qualified building inspectors without actual testimony presented. Costs of repair, alteration, or improvement of the structure shall be the cost necessary to bring the structure into compliance with the applicable codes relevant to the cited violations in force in the jurisdiction;

That, if the owner fails to comply with an order to repair or demolish the dwelling, building, or structure, the public officer may cause such dwelling, building, or structure to be repaired, altered, or improved or to be vacated and closed or demolished. Such abatement action shall commence within 270 days after the expiration of time specified in the order for abatement by the owner. Any time during which such action is prohibited by a court order issued pursuant to Code Section 41-2-13 or any other equitable relief granted by a court of competent jurisdiction shall not be counted toward the 270 days in which such abatement action must commence. The public officer shall cause to be posted on the main entrance of the building, dwelling, or structure a placard with the following words:

“This building is unfit for human habitation or commercial, industrial, or business use and does not comply with the applicable codes or has been ordered secured to prevent its use in connection with drug crimes or constitutes an endangerment to public health or safety as a result of unsanitary or unsafe conditions. The use or occupation of this building is prohibited and unlawful.”;

If the public officer has the structure demolished, reasonable effort shall be made to salvage reusable materials for credit against the cost of demolition. The proceeds of any moneys received from the sale of salvaged materials shall be used or applied against the cost of the demolition and removal of the structure, and proper records shall be kept showing application of sales proceeds. Any such sale of salvaged materials may be made without the necessity of public advertisement and bid. The public officer and governing authority are relieved of any and all liability resulting from or occasioned by the sale of any such salvaged materials, including, without limitation, defects in such salvaged materials; and

That the amount of the cost of demolition, including all court costs, appraisal fees, administrative costs incurred by the county tax commissioner or municipal tax collector or city revenue officer, and all other costs necessarily associated with the abatement action, including restoration to grade of the real property after demolition, shall be a lien against the real property upon which such cost was incurred.

The lien provided for in paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall attach to the real property upon the filing of a certified copy of the order requiring repair, closure, or demolition in the office of the clerk of superior court in the county where the real property is located and shall relate back to the date of the filing of the lis pendens notice required under subsection (c) of Code Section 41-2-12. The clerk of superior court shall record and index such certified copy of the order in the deed records of the county and enter the lien on the general execution docket. The lien shall be superior to all other liens on the property, except liens for taxes to which the lien shall be inferior, and shall continue in force until paid.

Upon final determination of costs, fees, and expenses incurred in accordance with this chapter, the public officer responsible for enforcement actions in accordance with this chapter shall transmit to the appropriate county tax commissioner or municipal tax collector or city revenue officer a statement of the total amount due and secured by said lien, together with copies of all notices provided to interested parties. The statement of the public officer shall be transmitted within 90 days of completion of the repairs, demolition, or closure. It shall be the duty of the appropriate county tax commissioner or municipal tax collector or city revenue officer, who is responsible or whose duties include the collection of municipal taxes, to collect the amount of the lien using all methods available for collecting real property ad valorem taxes, including specifically Chapter 4 of Title 48; provided, however, that the limitation of Code Section 48-4-78 which requires 12 months of delinquency before commencing a tax foreclosure shall not apply. A county tax commissioner shall collect and enforce municipal liens imposed pursuant to this chapter in accordance with Code Section 48-5-359.1. The county tax commissioner or municipal tax collector or city revenue officer shall remit the amount collected to the governing authority of the county or municipality whose lien is being collected.

Enforcement of liens pursuant to this Code section may be initiated at any time following receipt by the county tax commissioner or municipal tax collector or city revenue officer of the final determination of costs in accordance with this chapter. The unpaid lien amount shall bear interest and penalties from and after the date of final determination of costs in the same amount as applicable to interest and penalties on unpaid real property ad valorem taxes. An enforcement proceeding pursuant to Code Section 48-4-78 for delinquent ad valorem taxes may include all amounts due under this chapter.

The redemption amount in any enforcement proceeding pursuant to this Code section shall be the full amount of the costs as finally determined in accordance with this Code section together with interest, penalties, and costs incurred by the governing authority, county tax commissioner, municipal tax collector, or city revenue officer in the enforcement of such lien. Redemption of property from the lien may be made in accordance with the provisions of Code Sections 48-4-80 and 48-4-81.

The governing authority may waive and release any such lien imposed on property upon the owner of such property entering into a contract with the county or municipality agreeing to a timetable for rehabilitation of the real property or the dwelling, building, or structure on the property and demonstrating the financial means to accomplish such rehabilitation.

Where the abatement action does not commence in the superior court, review of a court order requiring the repair, alteration, improvement, or demolition of a dwelling, building, or structure shall be a de novo proceeding in the superior court under Code Sections 5-3-4 and 5-3-5.

In addition to the procedures and remedies in this chapter, a governing authority may provide by ordinance that designated public officers may issue citations for violations of state minimum standard codes, optional building, fire, life safety, and other codes adopted by ordinance, and conditions creating a public health hazard or general nuisance, and seek to enforce such citations in a court of competent jurisdiction prior to issuing a complaint in rem as provided in this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the county or municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement by summary proceedings or otherwise.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 30; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 41; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1419, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 41; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1161, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1347, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1196, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 907, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 41/HB 95; Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-32/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 41-2-9 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, in subsection (d), substituted “a de novo proceeding in” for “by direct appeal to” and “Code Sections 5-3-4 and 5-3-5” for “Code Section 5-3-29” at the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.

41-2-10.
Determination by public officer that dwelling, building, or structure is unfit or vacant, dilapidated, and being used in connection with the commission of drug crimes.

An ordinance adopted by a county or municipality under Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-9, this Code section, and Code Sections 41-2-11 through 41-2-17 shall provide that the public officer may determine, under existing ordinances, that a dwelling, building, or structure is unfit for human habitation or is unfit for its current commercial, industrial, or business use if he finds that conditions exist in such building, dwelling, or structure which are dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the occupants of such dwelling, building, or structure; of the occupants of neighborhood dwellings, buildings, or structures; or of other residents of such county or municipality. Such conditions may include the following (without limiting the generality of the foregoing):

Defects therein increasing the hazards of fire, accidents, or other calamities;

Lack of adequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities;

Dilapidation;

Disrepair;

Structural defects; and

Uncleanliness.

Such ordinance may provide additional standards to guide the public officer, or his agents, in determining the fitness of a dwelling, building, or structure for human habitation or for its current commercial, industrial, or business use.

An ordinance adopted by a county or municipality under Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-9, this Code section, and Code Sections 41-2-11 through 41-2-17 shall provide that the public officer may determine, under existing ordinances, that a dwelling, building, or structure is vacant, dilapidated, and being used in connection with the commission of drug crimes upon personal observation or report of a law enforcement agency and evidence of drug crimes being committed.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1419, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1161, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “municipality. Such” was substituted for “municipality; such” in the introductory paragraph of the Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 amendment to this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 284 (1989).

41-2-11.
Powers of public officers in regard to unfit buildings or structures.

An ordinance adopted by the governing body of the county or municipality may authorize the public officer to exercise such powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purpose and provisions of Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-10, this Code section, and Code Sections 41-2-12 through 41-2-17, including the following powers in addition to others granted in Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-10 and Code Sections 41-2-12 through 41-2-17:

To investigate the dwelling conditions in the unincorporated area of the county or in the municipality in order to determine which dwellings, buildings, or structures therein are unfit for human habitation or are unfit for current commercial, industrial, or business use or are vacant, dilapidated, and being used in connection with the commission of drug crimes;

To administer oaths and affirmations, to examine witnesses, and to receive evidence;

To enter upon premises for the purpose of making examinations; provided, however, that such entries shall be made in such manner as to cause the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession;

To appoint and fix the duties of such officers, agents, and employees as he deems necessary to carry out the purposes of the ordinances; and

To delegate any of his functions and powers under the ordinance to such officers and agents as he may designate.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1419, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1161, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41.

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 amendment to this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 284 (1989).

41-2-12.
Service of complaints or orders upon parties in interest and owners of unfit buildings or structures.

Complaints issued by a public officer pursuant to an ordinance adopted under Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-11, this Code section, and Code Sections 41-2-13 through 41-2-17 shall be served in the following manner. At least 14 days prior to the date of the hearing, the public officer shall mail copies of the complaint by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to all interested parties whose identities and addresses are reasonably ascertainable. Copies of the complaint shall also be mailed by first-class mail to the property address to the attention of the occupants of the property, if any, and shall be posted on the property within three business days of filing the complaint and at least 14 days prior to the date of the hearing.

For interested parties whose mailing address is unknown, a notice stating the date, time, and place of the hearing shall be published in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements appear in such county once a week for two consecutive weeks prior to the hearing.

A notice of lis pendens shall be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court in the county in which the dwelling, building, or structure is located at the time of filing the complaint in the appropriate court. Such notice shall have the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.

Orders and other filings made subsequent to service of the initial complaint shall be served in the manner provided in this Code section on any interested party who answers the complaint or appears at the hearing. Any interested party who fails to answer or appear at the hearing shall be deemed to have waived all further notice in the proceedings.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 30; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1508, § 3; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1419, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 41; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1538, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1196, § 4; Ga. L. 2004, p. 907, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “Code Section 41-2-13 through 41-2-17” was changed to “Code Sections 41-2-13 through 41-2-17” in subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “identities and addresses” was substituted for “identity and address” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that subsection (c) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

41-2-13.
Injunctions against order to repair, close, or demolish unfit buildings or structures.

Any person affected by an order issued by the public officer may petition to the superior court for an injunction restraining the public officer from carrying out the provisions of the order and the court may, upon such petition, issue a temporary injunction restraining the public officer pending the final disposition of the cause; provided, however, that such person shall present such petition to the court within 15 days of the posting and service of the order of the public officer. De novo hearings shall be had by the court on petitions within 20 days. The court shall hear and determine the issues raised and shall enter such final order or decree as law and justice may require; provided, however, that it shall not be necessary to file bond in any amount before obtaining a temporary injunction under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 30.

41-2-14.
Taking of unfit buildings or structures by eminent domain; police power.

Nothing in Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-13, this Code section, and Code Sections 41-2-15 through 41-2-17 shall be construed as preventing the owner or owners of any property from receiving just compensation for the taking of such property by the power of eminent domain under the laws of this state nor as permitting any property to be condemned or destroyed except in accordance with the police power of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41.

41-2-15.
Authority to use revenues, grants, and donations to repair, close, or demolish unfit buildings or structures.

Any county or municipality is authorized to make such appropriations from its revenues as it may deem necessary and may accept and apply grants or donations to assist it in carrying out the provisions of ordinances adopted in connection with the exercise of the powers granted under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1419, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 41.

41-2-16.
Construction of Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-17 with county or municipal local enabling Act, charter, and other laws, ordinances, and regulations.

Nothing in Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-15, this Code section, and Code Section 41-2-17 shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of any department of any county or municipality to enforce any provisions of its local enabling Act, its charter, or its ordinances or regulations nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and the powers conferred by this article shall be in addition to and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1419, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41.

41-2-17.
Prior ordinances relating to repair, closing, or demolition of unfit buildings or structures.

Ordinances relating to the subject matter of Code Sections 41-2-7 through 41-2-16 and this Code section adopted prior to July 1, 2001, shall have the same force and effect on and after said date as ordinances adopted subsequent to and by authority of these Code sections.

History.

Code 1981, §

41-2-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 45; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 41; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1196, § 5.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).